Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-1518
Election officials; other violations of Election Act; penalty; political subdivision; member of governing body; failure or refusal to perform duty; penalty.

(1) Any judge or clerk of election, any precinct or district inspector, or any other person upon whom any duty is imposed by the Election Act relating to elections who willfully does or performs anything prohibited by the act for which no other penalty is provided or neglects or omits to perform any such duty shall be guilty of a Class I misdemeanor and shall forfeit his or her office.

(2) Any member of a governing body of a political subdivision upon whom a duty is imposed under subsection (2) of section 32-1306 who fails or refuses to perform such duty is guilty of a Class I misdemeanor.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 417;

Laws 2022, LB843, § 48.

Under this section, a county clerk who neglects to furnish ballots and correct them, as required by the election laws, is liable to forfeit his office and to be fined and imprisoned. Wahlquist v. Adams County, 94 Neb. 682, 144 N.W. 171 (1913).